src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-1E-yyqnned_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - ââʹnned: # Verb 'to set off' - full paradigm
     ââʹnned+V+Inf: ââʹnned
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: âânam
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: âânak
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: âânn
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: ââʹnnep
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: ââʹnnveʹted
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: âʹnne
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: ââʹnet
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: ââʹn
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: õʹnnem
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: õʹnniǩ
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: õõʹni
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: õõʹnim
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: õõʹnid
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: õʹnne
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: õʹnneš
     ââʹnned+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: âânnam
     ââʹnned+V+Pot+Sg1: õõʹnžem
     ââʹnned+V+Pot+Sg2: õõʹnžiǩ
     ââʹnned+V+Pot+Sg3: õõʹnež
     ââʹnned+V+Pot+Pl1: õõʹnžep
     ââʹnned+V+Pot+Pl2: õõʹnžid
     ââʹnned+V+Pot+Pl3: õõʹnže
     ââʹnned+V+Pot+Sg4: õõʹnžet
     ââʹnned+V+Pot+ConNeg: õõʹnže
     ââʹnned+V+Cond+Sg1: âânčem
     ââʹnned+V+Cond+Sg2: âânčiǩ
     ââʹnned+V+Cond+Sg3: âânči
     ââʹnned+V+Cond+Pl1: âânčim
     ââʹnned+V+Cond+Pl2: âânčid
     ââʹnned+V+Cond+Pl3: âânče
     ââʹnned+V+Cond+Sg4: âânčeš
     ââʹnned+V+Cond+ConNeg: âânče
     ââʹnned+V+Imprt+Sg2: ââʹn
     ââʹnned+V+Imprt+Sg3: âânas
     ââʹnned+V+Imprt+Pl1: ââʹnnep
     ââʹnned+V+Imprt+Pl2: ââʹnned
     ââʹnned+V+Imprt+Pl3: ânnaz
     ââʹnned+V+Imprt+ConNeg: ââʹn
     ââʹnned+V+Imprt+ConNegII: õnnu
     ââʹnned+V+Actio+Ess: ââʹnnmen
     ââʹnned+V+Actio: ââʹnnem
     ââʹnned+V+Act+PrsPrc: õõʹnni
     ââʹnned+V+Act+PrfPrc: âânnam
     ââʹnned+V+Pass+PrfPrc: õnnum
     ââʹnned+V+VAbess: ââʹnǩâni
     ââʹnned+V+Ger+Ess: ââʹneen
     ââʹnned+V+Ger+Instr: ââʹneeʹl
     ââʹnned+V+Der/InchL+V+Inf: âʹnškuẹʹtted
